Hyphenation/Hyphenation.Library/Resources/hyph-en-us.hyp.txt
% DEK's hyphenation exception list, from hyphen.tex; not changed.
as-so-ciate
as-so-ciates
dec-li-na-tion
oblig-a-tory
phil-an-thropic
present
presents
project
projects
re-cog-ni-zance
ref-or-ma-tion
ret-ri-bu-tion
ta-ble
acad-e-my
acad-e-mies
ac-cu-sa-tive
acro-nym
acro-nyms
acu-punc-ture
acu-punc-tur-ist
ad-a-mant
add-a-ble
add-i-ble
adren-a-line
aero-space
af-ter-thought
af-ter-thoughts
agron-o-mist
agron-o-mists
al-ge-bra-i-cal-ly
al-ma-nac
al-ma-nacs
al-ma-nack
al-ma-nacks
anach-ro-nism
anach-ro-nis-tic
an-a-lect
an-a-lects
an-a-lyse
an-a-lysed
analy-ses
analy-sis
an-eu-rysm
an-eu-rysms
an-eu-rys-mal
an-iso-trop-ic
an-iso-trop-i-cal-ly
an-isot-ro-pism
an-isot-ropy
an-ni-ver-sary
an-ni-ver-saries
anom-a-ly
anom-a-lies
an-o-nym-i-ty
anon-y-mous
anon-y-mously
anti-bi-ot-ic
anti-bi-ot-ics
anti-deriv-a-tive
anti-deriv-a-tives
anti-holo-mor-phic
an-tin-o-my
an-tin-o-mies
anti-nu-clear
anti-nu-cle-on
an-tip-o-des
anti-rev-o-lu-tion-ary
a-peri-odic
apoth-e-o-ses
apoth-e-o-sis
ap-pen-di-ces
ap-pen-dix
ap-pen-dixes
ar-chi-me-dean
ar-chi-pel-ago
ar-chi-pel-a-gos
ar-chive
ar-chives
ar-chiv-ing
ar-chiv-ist
ar-chiv-ists
ar-che-typ-al
ar-che-type
ar-che-types
ar-che-typ-i-cal
arc-tan-gent
arc-tan-gents
areas
a-spher-ic
a-spher-i-cal
as-sign-a-ble
as-sign-or
as-sign-ors
as-sist-ant
as-sist-ance
as-sist-ant-ship
as-sist-ant-ships
as-trol-o-ger
as-trol-o-gers
as-tron-o-mer
as-tron-o-mers
asymp-to-matic
as-ymp-tot-ic
asyn-chro-nous
ath-er-o-scle-ro-sis
at-mos-phere
at-mos-pheres
at-tri-bute
at-trib-uted
at-trib-ut-able
au-to-ma-tion
au-tom-a-ton
au-tom-a-ta
auto-num-ber-ing
au-ton-o-mous
auto-re-gres-sion
auto-re-gres-sive
auto-round-ing
av-oir-du-pois
awar-ded
awe-struck
back-pedal
back-pedals
back-pedal-ing
back-scratcher
back-scratch-ing
band-lead-er
band-lead-ers
bank-roll
bank-rolls
bank-rupt
bank-rupts
bank-rupt-cy
bank-rupt-cies
bar-onies
base-line-skip
ba-thym-e-try
bathy-scaphe
bean-ies
be-drag-gle
be-drag-gled
bed-rid-den
bed-rock
be-dwarf
be-dwarfs
be-hav-iour
be-hav-iours
bevies
bib-lio-graph-i-cal
bib-li-og-ra-phy-style
bib-units
bi-dif-fer-en-tial
big-gest
big-shot
big-shots
bill-able
bio-in-for-mat-ics
bio-mass
bio-math-e-mat-ics
bio-med-i-cal
bio-med-i-cine
bio-rhythms
bio-weap-ons
bio-weap-on-ry
bit-map
bit-maps
bland-er
bland-est
blind-er
blind-est
blondes
blue-print
blue-prints
bo-lom-e-ter
bo-lom-e-ters
book-sell-er
book-sell-ers
bool-ean
bool-eans
bor-no-log-i-cal
bot-u-lism
brusquer
buf-fer
buf-fers
bun-gee
bun-gees
busier
busi-est
bussing
butted
buzz-word
buzz-words
cache-abil-ity
cache-able
ca-coph-o-ny
ca-coph-o-nies
call-er
call-ers
cam-era-men
cart-wheel
cart-wheels
ca-tarrh
ca-tarrhs
ca-tas-tro-phe
ca-tas-tro-phes
cat-a-stroph-ic
cat-a-stroph-i-cally
ca-tas-tro-phism
cat-e-noid
cat-e-noids
cau-li-flow-er
cha-me-leon
cha-me-leons
chan-cery
cha-ot-ic
chap-ar-ral
char-treuse
chemo-kine
chemo-kines
chemo-ther-apy
chemo-ther-a-pies
chloro-meth-ane
chloro-meth-anes
cho-les-teric
cig-a-rette
cig-a-rettes
cinque-foil
co-asso-cia-tive
coch-lea
coch-leas
coch-lear
co-designer
co-designers
co-gnac
co-gnacs
co-gno-scen-ti
co-ker-nel
co-ker-nels
col-lin-ea-tion
col-o-phon
col-o-phons
col-um-bine
col-um-bines
col-um-nar
col-umns
com-par-and
com-par-ands
com-pen-dium
com-po-nent-wise
comp-trol-ler
comp-trol-lers
com-put-able
com-put-abil-ity
con-form-able
con-form-ist
con-form-ists
con-form-ity
con-ge-ries
con-gress
con-gresses
con-struc-ted
con-struc-ti-ble
con-struc-ti-bil-ity
con-tract-able
con-trib-ute
con-trib-utes
con-trib-uted
copy-right-able
co-re-la-tion
co-re-la-tions
co-re-li-gion-ist
co-re-li-gion-ists
co-re-op-sis
co-re-spon-dent
co-re-spon-dents
co-se-cant
co-semi-sim-ple
co-tan-gent
cour-age
cou-ra-geous
cou-ra-geous-ly
cour-ses
co-work-er
co-work-ers
crank-case
crank-shaft
cric-ket
cric-kets
croc-o-dile
croc-o-diles
cross-hatch
cross-hatched
cross-hatch-ing
cross-over
cryp-to-gram
cryp-to-grams
cuff-link
cuff-links
cui-sines
cu-nei-form
cus-tom-er
cus-tom-ers
cus-tom-iz-a-ble
cus-tom-ize
cus-tom-izes
cus-tom-ized
cy-ber-virus
cy-ber-viruses
cy-ber-wea-pon
cy-ber-wea-pons
cy-to-kine
cy-to-kines
dachs-hund
dam-sel-fly
dam-sel-flies
dactyl-o-gram
dactyl-o-graph
data-base
data-bases
data-flow
data-path
data-paths
data-point
data-points
data-set
data-sets
data-type
data-types
date-stamp
date-stamps
de-allo-cate
de-allo-cates
de-allo-cated
de-allo-ca-tion
de-allo-ca-tions
de-clar-able
de-fin-i-tive
de-lec-ta-ble
demi-semi-qua-ver
demi-semi-qua-vers
de-moc-ra-cy
dem-o-crat
dem-o-crats
dem-o-crat-ic
de-moc-ra-tism
de-mon-stra-ble
de-mon-stra-bly
dem-on-strate
dem-on-strates
dem-on-strated
dem-on-stra-ting
dem-on-stra-tion
dem-on-stra-tions
demos
der-i-va-tion
der-i-va-tions
der-i-va-tion-al
de-riv-a-tive
de-riv-a-tives
dia-lect
dia-lects
di-a-lec-tal
dia-lec-tic
dia-lec-tics
di-a-lec-ti-cal
dia-lec-ti-cian
dia-lec-ti-cians
di-a-tom
di-a-toms
di-a-to-ma-ceous
dif-fract
dif-fracts
dif-frac-tion
dif-frac-tions
di-lem-ma
di-lem-mas
direr
dire-ness
dis-par-and
dis-par-ands
dis-traught-ly
dis-trib-ut-able
dis-trib-ute
dis-trib-utes
dis-trib-uted
dis-trib-ut-ing
dis-trib-u-tive
dis-util-ity
dou-ble-space
dou-ble-spaced
dou-ble-spac-ing
dou-ble-talk
doll-ish
drift-age
driv-ers
drom-e-dary
drom-e-daries
drop-let
drop-lets
dro-soph-i-la
du-op-o-list
du-op-o-lists
du-op-o-ly
du-op-o-lies
dys-lexia
dys-lec-tic
dys-topia
east-end-ers
eco-sys-tem
eco-sys-tems
eco-nom-ics
econ-o-mies
econ-o-mist
econ-o-mists
egg-shell
egg-shells
ei-gen-class
ei-gen-classes
ei-gen-val-ue
ei-gen-val-ues
elec-tro-en-cephalo-gram
electro-mechan-i-cal
electro-mechano-acoustic
elec-tro-pho-re-sis
elec-tro-pho-ret-ic
elit-ist
elit-ists
end-game
en-dos-copy
en-dos-copies
en-tre-pre-neur
en-tre-pre-neurs
en-tre-pre-neur-ial
ephem-era
ephem-eris
ephem-er-i-des
epi-graphs
ep-i-neph-rine
eps-to-pdf
equa-ted
equi-di-men-sional
equi-vari-ant
equi-vari-ance
er-go-nom-ic
er-go-nom-ics
er-go-nom-i-cally
es-sence
es-sences
eu-sta-chian
ever-si-ble
evert
everts
evert-ed
evert-ing
ex-plan-a-tory
ex-pli-cit
ex-pli-cit-ly
ex-quis-ite
ex-tra-or-di-nary
face-lift
face-lifts
face-lift-ing
fall-ing
fermi-ons
fi-du-ciary
fi-du-ciar-ies
figu-rine
figu-rines
fi-nite-ly
fla-gel-lum
fla-gel-la
flam-ma-bles
fledg-ling
flow-chart
flow-charts
fluor-os-copies
fluor-os-copy
font-enc
for-mi-da-ble
for-mi-da-bly
for-syth-ia
forth-right
fra-gil-i-ty
free-loader
free-loaders
free-sia
free-sias
friend-lier
friend-li-est
fri-vol-ity
fri-vol-i-ties
friv-o-lous
front-end
front-ends
ga-lac-tic
gal-axy
gal-ax-ies
gaz-et-teer
gaz-et-teers
gas-om-e-ter
ge-o-des-ic
ge-o-det-ic
ge-om-eter
ge-om-eters
geo-met-ric
geo-met-rics
ge-o-strophic
geo-ther-mal
ge-ot-ro-pism
giga-nodes
gno-mon
gno-mons
gran-di-ose
grand-uncle
grand-uncles
graph-eme
graph-emes
gra-phe-mic
gra-phe-mics
gra-phe-tic
gra-phe-tics
grapho-lin-guis-tic
grapho-lin-guis-tics
griev-ance
griev-ances
griev-ous
griev-ous-ly
group-like
hair-style
hair-styles
hair-styl-ist
hair-styl-ists
half-life
half-lives
half-space
half-spaces
half-tone
half-tones
half-way
har-bin-ger
har-bin-gers
har-le-quin
har-le-quins
hatch-eries
hei-nous
he-lio-pause
he-lio-trope
hemi-demi-semi-qua-ver
hemi-demi-semi-qua-vers
he-mo-glo-bin
he-mo-phil-ia
he-mo-phil-iac
he-mo-phil-iacs
hemo-rhe-ol-ogy
he-pat-ic
he-pat-ica
her-maph-ro-dite
her-maph-ro-dit-ic
he-roes
het-ero-in-ter-face
het-ero-in-ter-faces
hexa-dec-i-mal
hip-po-po-ta-mus
holo-deck
holo-decks
ho-lo-no-m
ho-lo-no-my
ho-lo-no-mies
ho-meo-mor-phic
ho-meo-mor-phism
ho-meo-stat-ic
ho-meo-stat-ics
ho-meo-sta-sis
hom-o-nym
hom-o-nyms
hom-o-nym-ic
ho-mon-y-mous
ho-mon-y-my
ho-moph-o-nous
ho-moph-o-ny
ho-mo-thetic
horse-rad-ish
hot-bed
hot-beds
hounds-teeth
hounds-tooth
hy-dro-ther-mal
hy-per-elas-tic-ity
hy-phen-a-tion
hy-phen-a-tions
hy-po-elas-tic-ity
hy-po-thal-a-mus
ico-nog-ra-pher
ico-nog-ra-phers
icon-o-graph-ic
ico-nog-ra-phy
ideals
ideo-graphs
id-i-o-lect
id-i-o-lects
idio-syn-crasy
idio-syn-cra-sies
idio-syn-cratic
idio-syn-crat-i-cal-ly
ig-nit-er
ig-nit-ers
ig-ni-tor
ignore-spaces
il-li-quid
il-li-quid-ity
im-mu-ni-za-tion
im-mu-no-mod-u-la-to-ry
im-ped-ance
im-ped-ances
in-du-bi-ta-ble
in-fin-ite-ly
in-fin-i-tes-i-mal
in-fra-struc-ture
in-fra-struc-tures
input-enc
in-sig-nif-i-cant
in-stall-er
in-stall-ers
in-teg-rity
in-ter-dis-ci-pli-nary
inter-ele-ment
in-ter-ga-lac-tic
in-ter-view-ee
in-ter-view-ees
in-trac-ta-ble
in-trac-ta-bil-ity
in-utile
in-util-i-ty
ir-ra-tio-nal
ir-re-duc-ible
ir-re-duc-ibly
ir-rev-o-ca-ble
iso-geo-met-ric
iso-geo-met-rics
iso-ther-mal
iso-trop-ic
isot-ropy
itin-er-ary
itin-er-ar-ies
je-re-mi-ad
je-re-mi-ads
jun-ior
key-note
key-notes
key-stroke
key-strokes
kilo-nodes
kiln-ing
lab-y-rinth
lab-y-rinths
lab-y-rin-thi-an
lab-y-rin-thine
lac-i-est
lam-en-ta-ble
land-scap-er
land-scap-ers
lar-cen-ist
lar-cen-ists
lar-ce-ny
lar-ce-nies
leaf-hop-per
leaf-hop-pers
leaf-let
leaf-lets
le-ga-cy
le-ga-cies
leg-ate
leg-ates
le-ga-tion
le-ga-tions
let-ter-space
let-ter-spaces
let-ter-spaced
let-ter-spac-ing
leu-ko-cyte
leu-ko-cytes
leu-ko-tri-ene
leu-ko-tri-enes
life-span
life-spans
life-style
life-styles
lift-off
light-weight
lim-ou-sines
line-backer
line-spacing
li-on-ess
li-quid-ity
lith-o-graphed
lith-o-graphs
lo-bot-omy
lo-bot-om-ize
loges
long-est
look-ahead
lo-quac-ity
love-struck
Lua-TeX
Lua-LaTeX
macro-eco-nomic
macro-eco-nomics
macro-econ-omy
mac-ros
Make-Index
mal-invest-ment
mal-invest-ments
mal-a-prop-ism
mal-a-prop-isms
man-slaugh-ter
man-u-script
man-u-scripts
mar-gin-al
mark-up
math-e-ma-ti-cian
math-e-ma-ti-cians
mattes
med-ic-aid
medi-ocre
medi-oc-ri-ties
mega-fau-na
mega-fau-nal
mega-lith
mega-liths
mega-nodes
mensch
meta-bol-ic
me-tab-o-lism
me-tab-o-lisms
me-tab-o-lite
me-tab-o-lites
meta-form
meta-forms
meta-lan-guage
meta-lan-guages
meta-phor
meta-phors
meta-phor-i-cal
meta-phor-i-cal-ly
meta-sta-bil-ity
meta-stable
meta-table
meta-tables
metem-psy-cho-sis
meth-od
meth-od-o-lo-gy
meth-od-o-lo-gies
meth-od-o-logical
meth-od-o-logically
me-trop-o-lis
me-trop-o-les
met-ro-pol-i-tan
met-ro-pol-i-tans
micro-eco-nomic
micro-eco-nomics
micro-econ-omy
micro-en-ter-prise
micro-en-ter-prises
mi-cro-fiche
mi-cro-fiches
micro-organ-ism
micro-organ-isms
mi-cro-struc-ture
mid-after-noon
mill-age
mil-li-liter
mil-li-liters
mimeo-graphed
mimeo-graphs
mim-ic-ries
mine-sweeper
mine-sweepers
min-is
mini-sym-po-sium
mini-sym-po-sia
mi-nut-er
mi-nut-est
mis-chie-vous-ly
mi-sers
mi-sog-a-my
mne-mon-ic
mne-mon-ics
mod-el-ling
mo-lec-u-lar
mol-e-cule
mol-e-cules
mon-archs
money-len-der
money-len-ders
mono-chrome
mono-en-er-getic
mon-oid
mon-oph-thong
mon-oph-thongs
mono-pole
mono-poles
mo-nop-oly
mono-space
mono-spaced
mono-spacing
mono-spline
mono-splines
mono-strofic
mo-not-o-nies
mo-not-o-nous
mo-ron-ism
mos-qui-to
mos-qui-tos
mos-qui-toes
mud-room
mud-rooms
mul-ti-fac-eted
mul-ti-plic-able
mul-ti-plic-ably
multi-user
name-space
name-spaces
neo-field
neo-fields
neo-nazi
neo-nazis
neph-ews
neph-rite
neph-ritic
new-est
news-let-ter
news-let-ters
nil-po-tent
node-list
node-lists
no-name
non-ar-chi-me-dean
non-ar-ith-met-ic
non-emer-gency
non-equi-vari-ance
none-the-less
non-euclid-ean
non-iso-mor-phic
non-pseudo-com-pact
non-smooth
non-uni-form
non-uni-form-ly
non-zero
not-with-stand-ing
nu-cleo-syn-the-sis
nu-cleo-tide
nu-cleo-tides
nut-crack-er
nut-crack-ers
oer-steds
off-line
off-load
off-loads
off-loaded
oli-gop-o-list
oli-gop-o-lists
oli-gop-o-ly
oli-gop-o-lies
om-ni-pres-ent
om-ni-pres-ence
ono-mat-o-poe-ia
ono-mat-o-po-et-ic
op-er-and
op-er-ands
orang-utan
orang-utans
or-tho-don-tist
or-tho-don-tists
or-tho-ker-a-tol-ogy
over-view
over-views
ox-id-ic
pad-ding
page-rank
pain-less-ly
pal-ette
pal-ettes
pa-rab-ola
pa-rab-olas
par-a-bol-ic
pa-rab-o-loid
par-a-digm
par-a-digms
para-chute
para-chutes
para-graph-er
para-le-gal
par-al-lel-ism
para-mag-net-ism
para-medic
para-medics
pa-ram-e-tri-za-tion
pa-ram-e-trize
para-mil-i-tary
para-mount
pass-over
path-o-gen-ic
peev-ish
peev-ish-ness
pen-al-ize
pen-al-ty
pen-al-ties
pen-ta-gon
pen-ta-gons
peri-spome-na
peri-spome-non
pe-tro-le-um
phe-nom-e-non
phi-lat-e-list
phi-lat-e-lists
